District of Columbia statutes.
50-301.29a

General requirements for private vehicles-for-hire.

A private vehicle-for-hire company shall:

(1)

Create an application process for a person to apply to register as a private vehicle-for-hire operator;

(2)

Maintain an up-to-date registry of the operators and vehicles associated with the private vehicle-for-hire company;

(3)

Provide the following information on its website:

(A)

The private vehicle-for-hire company’s customer service telephone number or electronic mail address;

(B)

The private vehicle-for-hire company’s zero tolerance policy established pursuant to paragraphs (9) and (10) of this section;

(C)

The procedure for reporting a complaint about an operator who a passenger reasonably suspects violated the zero tolerance policy under paragraphs (9) and (10) of this section; and

(D)

A telephone number or electronic mail address for the Commission;

(4)

Verify that an initial safety inspection of a motor vehicle used as a private vehicle-for-hire was conducted within 90 days of beginning service and that the vehicle passed the inspection and was determined safe by a licensed mechanic in the District pursuant to § 47-2851.03(a)(9) or an inspection station authorized by the State of Maryland or the Commonwealth of Virginia to perform vehicle safety inspections; provided, that an initial safety inspection need not be conducted if the motor vehicle used for service is compliant with an annual state-required safety inspection. A safety inspection conducted pursuant to this paragraph shall check the following motor vehicle equipment to ensure that such equipment is safe and in proper operating condition:

(A)

Brakes and parking brake;

(B)

All exterior lights, including headlights, parking lights, brake lights, and license plate illumination lights;

(C)

Turn signal devices;

(D)

Steering and suspension;

(E)

Tires, wheels, and rims;

(F)

Mirrors;

(G)

Horn;

(H)

Windshield and other glass, including wipers and windshield defroster;

(I)

Exhaust system;

(J)

Hood and area under the hood, including engine fluid levels and belts;

(K)

Interior of vehicle, including driver’s seat, seat belts, and air bags;

(L)

Doors;

(M)

Fuel system; and

(N)

Floor pan.

(5)

Verify the safety inspection status of a vehicle as described in paragraph (4) of this section on an annual basis after the initial verification is conducted;

(6)

Perform the background checks required by § 50-301.29b(b) on each applicant before private vehicle-for-hire service is provided and update those checks every 3 years thereafter;

(7)

Establish a trade dress as required by § 50-301.29d;

(8)

Transmit the required amount pursuant to § 50-301.31(b)(11);

(9)

(A)

Establish a policy of zero tolerance for the use of alcohol or illegal drugs or being impaired by the use of alcohol or drugs while a private vehicle-for-hire operator is logged into a private vehicle-for-hire company’s digital dispatch;

(B)

Immediately suspend, for the duration of the investigation conducted pursuant to subparagraph (C) of this paragraph, a private vehicle-for-hire operator upon receiving a written complaint from a passenger submitted through regular mail or electronic means containing a reasonable allegation that the operator violated the zero tolerance policy established by subparagraph (A) of this paragraph; and

(C)

Conduct an investigation when a passenger alleges that a private vehicle-for-hire operator violated the zero tolerance policy established by paragraph (A) of this subparagraph;

(10)

(A)

Establish a policy of zero tolerance for discrimination or discriminatory conduct on the basis of a protected characteristic under § 2-1402.31 while a private vehicle-for-hire operator is logged into a private vehicle-for-hire company’s digital dispatch. Discriminatory conduct may include:

(i)

Refusal of service on the basis of a protected characteristic, including refusal of service to an individual with a service animal unless the operator has a documented serious medical allergy to animals on file with the private vehicle-for-hire company;

(ii)

Using derogatory or harassing language on the basis of a protected characteristic;

(iii)

Refusal of service based on the pickup or drop-off location of the passenger; or

(iv)

Rating a passenger on the basis of a protected characteristic;

(B)

It shall not constitute discrimination under this paragraph for a private vehicle-for-hire operator to refuse to provide service to an individual with disabilities due to violent, seriously disruptive, or illegal conduct by the individual. A private vehicle-for-hire operator shall not, however, refuse to provide service to an individual with a disability solely because the individual’s disability results in appearance or involuntary behavior that may offend, annoy, or inconvenience the operator or another person;

(C)

Immediately suspend, for the duration of the investigation conducted pursuant to subparagraph (D) of this paragraph, a private vehicle-for-hire operator upon receiving a written complaint from a passenger submitted through regular mail or electronic means containing a reasonable allegation that the operator violated the zero tolerance policy established by subparagraph (A) of this paragraph; and

(D)

Conduct an investigation when a passenger makes a reasonable allegation that an operator violated the zero tolerance policy established by subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;

(11)

Maintain records relevant to the requirements of this section for the purposes of enforcement; and

(12)

Submit to the Commission for the purposes of registration:

(A)

Proof that the private vehicle-for-hire company is licensed to do business in the District;

(B)

Proof that the private vehicle-for-hire company maintains a registered agent in the District;

(C)

Proof that the private vehicle-for-hire company maintains a website that includes the information required by paragraph (3) of this section;

(D)

Proof that the private vehicle-for-hire company has established a trade dress required by § 50-301.29d, including an illustration or photograph of the trade dress;

(E)

A written description of how the private vehicle-for-hire company’s digital dispatch operates;

(F)

Proof that the private vehicle-for-hire company has secured the insurance policies required by § 50-301.29c; and

(G)

The certification required by § 50-301.29g; provided, that the Commission shall not impose a registration, licensure, certification, or other similar requirement for a private vehicle-for-hire company to operate in the District that exceeds the requirements set forth in this subchapter.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 20j-1
as added Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-197, § 2(k), 61 DCR 12430
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-197: Section 7 of D.C. Law 20-197 provided, in part, that §§ 1, 2, 3, and 4 of the act shall apply as of March 10, 2015.